Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4329.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Ensuring transparency in the overall management of Children Protective Services 
Agencies (DCF) and to create a Public Independent Investigative Commission to 
frequently/periodically investigate of complaints from the public on DCF alleged excessive 
abuse of power, abuse of children in DCF system, racial disparities, discrimination, wrongful 
targeting, profiling, improper take away of minority children’s especially African American and 
Hispanic children and parent’s rights by DCF, wrongful displacement of children from their 
parents especially in the minorities communities, middle class and lower parents, single parent 
and LGBTQ communities by DCF.The requirement for the new formation of the Public 
Independent Investigative Commission for DCF must include different diversities, minorities, 
non-economic and disadvantaged communities. The members will be selected only from public 
population and appointed by residents of Massachusetts to serve maximum of one year term 
only. There will be no inclusion of members of the Judicial (lawyers, Judges or Governor 
Chosen as the commission’s members) in the reformed DCF agency due to conflict of interest. 

of 2 14 There will be no reappointment of the same members after the one term ends. Be it enacted by 
the People and by their authority: The reform must include the public discloser of member’s 
general information since they are serving the public, we all have the right to know who they are.